District of Columbia statutes.
7-2043

Right of entry and inspection.

To ensure compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter, the Mayor, or any duly authorized designee, shall be permitted at reasonable times to conduct an inspection of any child development facility licensed pursuant to this subchapter or for which a license application has been filed.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 14, 46 DCR 274
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.
See notes to § 7-2031.
1981 Ed., § 6-3633.